Connecticut, session 2026, SB00476.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 18-81oo of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Correction shall [not use the provision of
voice communication service or any other communication service to
persons who are in the custody of the commissioner and confined in a
correctional facility to supplant in-person contact visits any such person
may be eligible to receive] permit any person who is confined in a
correctional facility and housed with the general population of such
facility to have not less than three in-person visits per week.
(b) (1) [On and after July 1, 2022, the] The commissioner shall provide
voice communication service to persons who are in the custody of the
commissioner and confined in a correctional facility. The commissioner
may supplement such voice communication service with any other
communication service, including, but not limited to, video
communication and electronic mail services. Any such communication
service shall be provided free of charge to such persons and any
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 476
communication, whether initiated or received through any such service,
shall be free of charge to the person initiating or receiving the
communication.
(2) Each person in the custody of the commissioner and confined in a
correctional facility shall be eligible to use the voice communication
service described in subdivision (1) of this subsection for at least ninety
minutes on each day of such person's confinement, provided the
provisions of this subdivision shall not be interpreted to interfere with
the standard operations of the facility in which such person is confined.
(c) [On and after July 1, 2022, the] The state shall not receive revenue
for the provision of any communication service to any person in the
custody of the commissioner and confined in a correctional facility.
(d) The Commissioner of Correction shall not use the provision of
voice communication service or any other communication service to a
person who is in the custody of the commissioner and confined in a
correctional facility to supplant in-person visits authorized under this
section, including any in-person contact visit that such person may be
eligible to receive.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Upon the release of any person
from a correctional facility, the Department of Correction shall disburse
to such person the remaining balance in such person's Inmate Trust
Fund account. The department may make such disbursement to the
formerly incarcerated person in the form of cash, a check, or a prepaid
device, provided the department may not disburse funds by means of a
prepaid device unless the department also provides the formerly
incarcerated person with at least one alternative option of receiving the
disbursed funds by cash or check.
(b) In any situation where the department is unable to make such
disbursement upon release of such person because the department was
not informed of the person's release date at least two weeks in advance
of such date, the department shall obtain a mailing address from such
person prior to, or at the time of, such person's release, and mail such
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 476
disbursement to such person. In any such situation, not later than two
weeks after such person is released, the department shall mail the
disbursement by United States mail to the mailing address provided by
the formerly incarcerated person.
(c) If the department disburses funds by means of a prepaid device
pursuant to this section, neither the department nor the issuer of the
prepaid device may impose, or cause to be imposed, any fee payable by
the formerly incarcerated person. As used in this section, "prepaid
device" means a card, code or other means of access to a consumer's
account held by a financial institution or other financial service
provider.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 18-81oo
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 2, the language was reorganized as Subsecs. (a) to (c).
JUD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3